src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection

!! Nouns in ERZYA inflect for number, case and declension (definite, indefinite and possessive).

!Problems
!LEXICON N-COLL_
!+Coll+Pl+Nom+Indef: #;
!LEXICON N-COM_
!+SP+Com+Indef: #;

!Defective paradigms
LEXICON N_PELE !!= @CODE@ пеле:пель, ало:ал
+Relat+Abl:%>{дт}О1 K ;
+Relat+Loc:%>{оеэØ} K ;
+Relat+Prl:%>Г2а K ;
+Orth/PhonDeriv+Loc+Der+Der/cje+Pron:%>це N2_DEF_DECLENSION_KUDO ;
+Der+Der/ks:%>кс N_LEVKS ;
+Relat+Lat:%>{оеэØ}в K ;

LEXICON VOCATIVE_
+Voc: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VOCATIVE_J
+Voc:%>й ENDLEX ;

LEXICON VOCATIVE_KAJ
+Voc:%>кай ENDLEX ;

!LEXICON VOCATIVE_SG_NOM_PXSG3
!+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ENDLEX ;



!! ## KINSHIP 

!LEXICON N-KIN_KAL
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KAL ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_KEL1
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KEL1 ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_PEJ
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PEJ ;
! N-KIN ;

LEXICON N-KIN_LAK
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAK ;
 N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_KIT
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KIT ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_OSH
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_OSH ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_KLASS
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KLASS ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_PANGO
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PANGO ;
! N-KIN ;

!LEXICON N-KIN_TINGE
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TINGE ;
! N-KIN ;
!LEXICON N-KIN_VELE_IS-KE-DIM
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin+Der/ke+Der/Dimin:@P.POS.N@ N-KIN_VELE ;
LEXICON N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е N-KIN_VELE ;
LEXICON N-KIN_VELE
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
 N-KIN ;
!LEXICON N-KIN_PIZE2_IS-NE-DIM
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@ N-KIN_PIZE2 ;
!LEXICON N-KIN_PIZE2
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
! N-KIN ;

LEXICON N_KUDO_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_KUDO
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@+Relat:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_KUDO ;
LEXICON N-KIN_KUDO
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
 N-KIN ;


!! ## HUMAN 

LEXICON N-HUM_KAL
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KAL ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_TYL
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@{frontHard} NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON N-HUM_KEL1
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KEL1 ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_PEJ
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PEJ ;

LEXICON N-HUM_LAK
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAK ;

LEXICON N-HUM_LAV
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAV ;

LEXICON N-HUM_TEV
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TEV ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_KIT
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KIT ;

LEXICON N-HUM_OZKS
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_OZKS ;

LEXICON N-HUM_LEVKS
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@{frontHard} NMN_KAL ;
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@%>{оеэØ} DIAL-NW-WITH-ST-AFTER-STEM ;

LEXICON N-HUM_ROZ1
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@{frontSoft} NMN_KAL ;

LEXICON N-HUM_OSH
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@{back} NMN_OSH ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_KENKSH
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@{frontHard} NMN_OSH ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_KLASS
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KLASS ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_PANGO
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PANGO ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_TINGE
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TINGE ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_TESHTE
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TESHTE ;

!LEXICON N-HUM_VELE
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
!LEXICON N-HUM_PIZE2
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
LEXICON N-HUM_KUDO
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;

!! ## PLACE 
!LEXICON N_KAL_PLC
!N-PLC_KAL ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KAL
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KAL ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_KEL1
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KEL1 ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_TYL
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@{frontHard} NMN_KAL ;

!LEXICON N_LAK_PLC
!N-PLC_LAK ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_LAK
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAK ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_LAV
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAV ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_TEV
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TEV ;

!LEXICON N_KIT_PLC
!N-PLC_KIT ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KIT
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KIT ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_OZKS
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_OZKS ;

!LEXICON N_OSH_PLC
!N-PLC_OSH ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_OSH
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;
!€# ошов +Sem/Plc+SP+Lat+Indef: 
!€# ош%>{оеэØ}в
!€0 ош0ов

!LEXICON N_KLASS_PLC
!N-PLC_KLASS ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KLASS
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KLASS ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_CHUVTO
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_CHUVTO ;

!LEXICON N-PLC_KARDAZ
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KARDAZ ;

!LEXICON N_PANGO_PLC
!N-PLC_PANGO ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_PANGO
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_PANGO ;

!LEXICON N_TINGE_PLC
!N-PLC_TINGE ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_TINGE
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_TINGE ;

!LEXICON N_KI_PLC
!N-PLC_KI ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KI
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KI ;

!LEXICON N_VELE_PLC
!N-PLC_VELE ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_VELE
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;

!LEXICON N_PIZE2_PLC
!N-PLC_PIZE2 ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_PIZE2
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;

!LEXICON N_KUDO_PLC
!N-PLC_KUDO ;
!LEXICON N-PLC_KUDO
!@P.POS.N@+Sem/Plc:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KUDO ;

!! ## LATIVE 
!LEXICON N_KAL-LAT
! N_KAL ;

!LEXICON N_KEL1-LAT
! N_KEL1 ;

!LEXICON N_LAK-LAT
! N_LAK ;

!LEXICON N_KIT-LAT
! N_KIT ;

!LEXICON N_OSH-LAT_SUB
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth: N_OSH-LAT ;
!LEXICON N_OSH-LAT
! N_OSH ;

!LEXICON N_KLASS-LAT
! N_KLASS ;

!LEXICON N_PANGO-LAT
! N_PANGO ;

!LEXICON N_TINGE-LAT
! N_TINGE ;

!LEXICON N_KI-LAT
! N_KI ;

!LEXICON N_KENKSH-LAT
! N_KENKSH ;

!LEXICON N_OZKS-LAT
! N_OZKS ;

!LEXICON N_VELE-LAT
! N_VELE ;
!LEXICON N_PIZE2-LAT
! N_PIZE2 ;
!LEXICON N_KUDO-LAT
! N_KUDO ;

!! ## VOCATIVE
LEXICON N_READY-VOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;
LEXICON N_VOC_PX1SG
!This has no other noun forms: тиринем
+Voc+PxSg1: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON N_KAJ_HUMVOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum+Der+Der/kaj+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_AJ_HUMVOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Hum+Der+Der/aj+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

!LEXICON N_HUMVOC
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Hum+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_KAJ_KINVOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin+Der+Der/kaj+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

LEXICON N_AJ_KINVOC
@P.POS.N@+Sem/Kin+Der+Der/aj+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

!LEXICON N_KINVOC
!@P.POS.N@!+Sem/Kin+Voc:@P.POS.N@ # ;

!! ## NAMES OF MONTHS
!LEXICON N-MONTHS_KAL_SUB
!+Sem/Mnth+Use/NG+Err/Orth: NMN_KAL ;

!LEXICON N-MONTHS_LAV
!+Sem/Mnth: NMN_LAV ;

!! ## COMMON NOUNS 

LEXICON N_KAL_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KAL ;
LEXICON N_KAL
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KAL ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_SAN_errorth_je_for_jo
@U.COMPOUND.NO@+Relat+Err/Orth-je-for-jo:@U.COMPOUND.NO@ N_SAN ;
LEXICON N_RELAT_SAN
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@+Relat:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_SAN ;

LEXICON N_SAN_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_SAN ;

LEXICON N_SAN
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_SAN ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_LAV_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_LAV ;
LEXICON N_LAV_no_comp
@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@:@U.COMPOUND.NO@@D.COMPOUND.YES@ N_LAV ;

LEXICON N_LAV
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAV ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_TEV_ERROR_SHB_VELE
+Err/Orth-stem-cons-should-be-je: NMN_TEV_ERROR_SHB_VELE ;
LEXICON	NMN_TEV_ERROR_SHB_VELE
! cases that take no onset O
! Ine, Ill, Ela, Abl, Dat, Prl, Cmpr, Abe, Com, Tra
! Pl
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
ABE-INDEF ;
ABL-INDEF ;
CMP-INDEF ;
COM-INDEF ;
DAT-INDEF ;
ELA-INDEF ;
ILL-INDEF ;
INE-INDEF ;
PRL-INDEF ;
TRA-INDEF ;
SG-NOM-INDEF ;
SG-ABE-DEF ;
SG-ABL-DEF ;
SG-ELA-DEF ;
SG-INE-DEF ;
SG-PRL-DEF ;
SG-TRA-DEF ;
PL-NOM-INDEF ;
NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;

LEXICON N_TEV_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_TEV ;
LEXICON N_TEV
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_LAV ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;

LEXICON N_T1_rusmyv
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_T1 ;
LEXICON N_T1_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_T1 ;
LEXICON N_T1 !!= * @CODE@ кель:кель %^Ь2ZERO
! harmony: front
@P.POS.N@:@P.POS.N@ NMN_KEL1 ;
@P.POS.N@+Der+Der/Dimin+N:@P.POS.N@%>Н1е{frontSoft} NMN_KUDO ;
+Err/Orth-missing-t-in-def-pl:%>не NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION_CASES ;! Remove soft sign, tag for t-less

LEXICON N_KEL1_rusmyv
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KEL1 ;
LEXICON N_KEL1_rus100
+Use/SpellNoSugg: N_KEL1 ;
