src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
ававткине:ававткине N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
ававтыне:ававтыне N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
авакуда:ава#куда N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
авкине:авкине N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "" ;
азербайджанец:азербайджанец N-HUM_OSH  "azeri" ;
альне:альне N-KIN_VELE_IS-NE-DIM  "aviomiehen (nuorempi) veli" ;
аляй:аляй N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
архив:архив N_TEV  "arkisto" ;
атявтке:атявтке N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
аштитейтерь:аштитейтерь N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
бельгиец:бельгиец N-HUM_OSH  "belgialainen" ;
бизьгатай:бизьгатай N_KAL  "" ;
бодяй:бодяй N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
ботаник:ботаник N-HUM_LAK  "kasvitieteilijä" ;
вадринекай:вадринекай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
ванынекай:ванынекай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
варданка:варданка N-HUM_KUDO  "orjatar" ;
васолбаба:васол#баба N-KIN_KUDO  "äidinäiti" ;
васолбодя:васолбодя N-KIN_KUDO  "äidinisä" ;
вастакай:вастакай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
вежавай:вежавай N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
венчакай:венчакай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "morsian" ;
вечкабаба:вечка#баба N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
вечкадеда:вечка#деда N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
викшневть:викшневть N_T1  "" ;
волисполком:волисполком N_KAL  "" ;
гениальность:гениальность N_T1_rus100  "" ;
геолог:геолог N-HUM_KAL  "geologi" ;
гестаповец:гестаповец N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
дань:дань N_KAL_rus100  "vero" ;
дар:дар N_KAL_rus100  "" ;
датчанава:датчан#ава N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
десидератив:десидератив N_TEV  "" ;
десятник:десятник N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
дирякай:дирякай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
дугай:дугай N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
дугакай:дугакай N_KAJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
жойть:жойть N_T1  "" ;
зависимость:зависимость N_T1_rus100  "riippuvaisuus" ;
залив:залив N_TEV  "lahti" ;
землевладелец:землевладелец N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
идемломань:идем#ломань N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
инебаба:ине#баба N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
инессив:инессив N_TEV  "inessiivi" ;
ирландец:ирландец N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
казачка:казачка N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
казеин:казеин N_KAL  "" ;
каменщик:каменщик N-HUM_LAK  "muurari" ;
кенгелькай:кенгелькай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
кенкшвецть:кенкш#вецть N_T1  "" ;
классовость:классовость N_T1_rus100  "" ;
конъюнктив:конъюнктив N_TEV  "" ;
кореец:кореец N-HUM_OSH  "korealainen" ;
корьмай:корьмай N_AJ_KINVOC  "elättäjä" ;
крестник:кресник N-KIN_LAK  "" ;
крестник:крестник N-KIN_LAK  "" ;
куйкал:куй#кал N_KAL  "" ;
кумыкава:кумык#ава N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
кшипечть:кши#печть N_T1  "" ;
леля:леля N-KIN_KUDO  "isoveli" ;
лелякай:лелякай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
локомотив:локомотив N_TEV  "veturi" ;
ломаломань:лома#ломань N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
любовник:любовник N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
мамай:мамай N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
налксиялга:налксиялга N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
находчивость:находчивость N_T1_rus100  "" ;
нул:нул N_KAL  "" ;
нумолкай:нумолкай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
объектив:объектив N_TEV  "(fys.) objektiivi" ;
оинекай:оинекай N_KAJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
олимпиец:олимпиец N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
оньксть:оньксть N_T1  "" ;
отчётность:отчётность N_T1_rus100  "tilivelvollisuus" ;
офтальмолог:офтальмолог N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
пенерьвакай:пенерьвакай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
подкулачник:подкулачник N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
покштяй:покштяй N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
попай:попай N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
потребность:потребность N_T1_rus100  "tarve" ;
привод:привод N_KAL  "" ;
прилив:прилив N_TEV  "vuoksi" ;
приёмщик:приёмщик N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
ртуть:ртуть N_T1_rus100  "" ;
сваткай:сваткай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
семитолог:семитолог N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
сизевть:сизевть N_T1  "" ;
солидарность:солидарность N_T1_rus100  "solidaarisuus" ;
стольначальник:стольначальник N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
стул:стул N_KAL  "tuoli" ;
тейтерьге:тейтерьге N-HUM_KUDO  "" ;
тейтерьэйкакш:тейтерь#эйкакш N-HUM_OSH  "" ;
тетя:тетя N-KIN_KUDO  "isä" ;
тетяй:тетяй N_AJ_KINVOC  "" ;
тетякай:тетякай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
тингетенсть:тингетенсть N_T1  "" ;
урьвинекай:урьвинекай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
фенолог:фенолог N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
цимбир:цимбир N_KAL  "" ;
цыганава:цыган#ава N-HUM_KUDO  "mustalaisnainen" ;
цёрай:цёрай VOCATIVE_  "" ;
цёракай:цёракай VOCATIVE_  "" ;
чаулай:чаулай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
чаулкай:чаулкай N_AJ_HUMVOC  "" ;
чувтонархуцть:чувтонархуцть N_T1  "" ;
шичеаля:шичеаля N-KIN_KUDO  "" ;
шкинекай:шкинекай N_KAJ_KINVOC  "" ;
штуцер:штуцер N-HUM_KAL  "" ;
экскаваторщик:экскаваторщик N-HUM_LAK  "" ;
